North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18C. North Carolina State Lottery.
Article 1. General Provisions and Definitions.

§ 18C-101.
Citation.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina State Lottery Act.

History.

2005-344, s. 1.

§ 18C-102.
Purpose and intent.

The General Assembly declares that the purpose of this Chapter is to establish a State-operated lottery to generate funds for the public purposes described in this Chapter.

History.

2005-344, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 31.1(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 31.1(b), effective July 1, 2005, deleted the last sentence, which read: “The net revenues generated by the lottery shall not supplant revenues already expended or projected to be expended for those public purposes, and lottery net revenues shall supplement rather than be used as substitute funds for the total amount of money allocated for those public purposes.”

§ 18C-103.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commission” means the North Carolina State Lottery Commission.

“Commissioner” means a member of the Commission.

“Director” means the person selected by the Commission to be the chief administrator of the North Carolina State Lottery.

“Game” or “lottery game” means any procedure or amusement authorized by the Commission where prizes are distributed among persons who have paid, or unconditionally agreed to pay, for tickets or shares that provide the opportunity to win those prizes and does not utilize a video gaming machine as defined in G.S. 14-306.1(c).

“Lottery” means any lottery game or series of games established and operated pursuant to this Chapter.

“Lottery contractor” means a person other than a lottery retailer with whom the Commission has contracted for the purpose of providing goods or services to the Commission on an ongoing basis.

(6a)

“Lottery supplier” means a person, other than a lottery retailer, with whom the Commission has contracted for the purpose of providing goods or services to the Commission for an individual purchase which may include a maintenance program.

“Person” means any natural person or corporation, limited liability company, trust, association, partnership, joint venture, subsidiary, or other business entity.

(7a)

“Potential contractor” or “lottery potential contractor” means any person other than a lottery retailer who submits a bid, proposal, or offer to procure a contract for goods or services for the Commission on an ongoing basis.

“Retailer”, “lottery retailer”, or “lottery game retailer” means a person with whom the Commission has contracted to sell tickets or shares in lottery games.

“Share” means any method of participation in a lottery game, other than by a ticket purchased on an equivalent basis with a ticket.

“Ticket” means any tangible evidence authorized by the Commission to demonstrate participation in a lottery game.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-357, s. 5, effective July 27, 2009.

History.

2005-344, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 31.1(c); 2009-357, s. 5; 2009-570, s. 32(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 31.1(c), effective July 1, 2005, in subdivision (4), added “and does not utilize a video gaming machine as defined in G.S. 14-306.1(c)”; and in subdivision (11), inserted “other than a lottery retailer”.

Session Laws 2009-357, s. 5, effective July 27, 2009, in subdivision (6), added “on an ongoing basis” at the end; added subdivisions (6a) and (7a); and deleted subdivision (11), which read: “ ‘Vendor’ or ‘lottery vendor’ means any person other than a lottery retailer who submits a bid, proposal, or offer to procure a contract for goods or services for the Commission.”

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 32(a), effective August 28, 2009, inserted “or ‘lottery potential contractor’ ” in subdivision (7a).

§§ 18C-104 through 18C-109.

Reserved for future codification purposes.